Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Article 2. Uniform Conservation Easement Act

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2005, ch. 127, § 1, and Laws 2005, ch. 167, § 1, both enacted an article 2 in chapter 1 of this title. The article enacted by ch. 167 has been redesignated as article 3 in chapter 1 of this title at the direction of the legislative service office.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 127, § 2, makes the article effective July 1, 2005.

§ 34-1-201.
Short title; definitions.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Uniform Conservation Easement Act”.

As used in this article, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Conservation easement” means a nonpossessory interest of a holder in real property imposing limitations or affirmative obligations the purposes of which include retaining or protecting natural, scenic, or open space values of real property, assuring its availability for agricultural, forest, recreational or open space use, protecting natural resources, maintaining or enhancing air or water quality, or preserving the historical, architectural, archeological or cultural aspects of real property;

“Holder” means:

A governmental body empowered to hold an interest in real property under the laws of this state or the United States but does not include the Wyoming board of land commissioners after the effective date of 2008 House Enrolled Act 15; or

A charitable corporation, charitable association or charitable trust, a primary purpose or power of which includes retaining or protecting the natural, scenic or open space values of real property, assuring the availability of real property for agricultural, forest, recreational or open space use, protecting natural resources, maintaining or enhancing air or water quality, or preserving the historical, architectural, archeological or cultural aspects of real property.

“Third-party right of enforcement” means a right provided in a conservation easement to enforce any of its terms granted to a governmental body, charitable corporation, charitable association or charitable trust, which, although eligible to be a holder, is not a holder;

“This act” means W.S.

34-1-201

through

34-1-207

.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 127, § 1; ch. 230, § 7; 2008, ch. 26, § 2; ch. 116, §
4.

The 2005 amendment

substituted “34-1-207” for “34-1-206” in (b)(iv).

Laws 2005, ch. 230, § 13, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2005.

The 2008 amendments.

The first 2008 amendment, by ch. 26, §
2, inserted “but does not include the Wyoming board of land commissioners after the effective date of this act” in (b)(ii)(A).

Laws 2008, ch. 26, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2008.

The second 2008 amendment, by ch. 116, §
4, added “but does not include the Wyoming board of land commissioners after the effective date of 2008 House Enrolled Act 15” in (b)(ii)(A).

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 230, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.” The introductory language to Laws 2005, ch. 230, § 7, provides that the amendment by that section is effective notwithstanding the conflicting legislation provision.

Editor's notes.—

Laws 2008, Ch. 116, sections 3 and 4 state in relevant part: “Section 3.
Except as provided in Section 4 of this act, any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

“Section 4. Notwithstanding section 3 of this act, the amendment of
W.S. 34-1-201(b)(ii)(A) by 2008 House Enrolled Act 15, being original House Bill 0111 [Ch. 26], shall not be effective..”

Restrictions. —

Conservation easement administrator did not err in rejecting the owners’ plans to construct a main residence, a guest house, and a caretaker’s quarters on each of the two parcels governed by the conservation easement because the easement unambiguously limited the owners to construction of one single-family residential structure and associated improvements; the phrase “associated improvements” was unambiguous and did not include additional residential structures such as guest houses or caretaker’s quarters; fulfilling the purposes of the easement did not grant a license to disregard the limitation of one residential structure; and zoning regulations could not override the restrictions placed on the property by the easement. Four B Props., LLC v. Nature Conservancy, 2020 WY 24, 458 P.3d 832,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 2020).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Hicks v. Dowd: The End Of Perpetuity?”, see 8 Wyo. L. Rev. 25 (2008).

§ 34-1-202.
Creation; conveyance; acceptance and duration.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, a conservation easement may be created, conveyed, recorded, assigned, released, modified, terminated or otherwise altered or affected in the same manner as other easements. The provisions of W.S.

34-1-141

shall apply to this article.

No right or duty in favor of or against a holder and no right in favor of a person having a third-party right of enforcement arises under a conservation easement before its acceptance by the holder and a recordation of the acceptance.

Except as provided by W.S. 34-1-203(b), a conservation easement is unlimited in duration unless the instrument creating the easement provides otherwise.

An interest in real property and any interest in minerals including any leasehold interests are not impaired in any way by a conservation easement unless the owners of those interests consent to the conservation easement.

This act shall not alter the law of Wyoming regarding the primacy of the mineral estate and any easement created hereunder shall not limit the right of a mineral owner or his lessee to reasonable use of the surface for the purpose of mineral exploration and production unless the owners and lessees of the entire mineral estate and geologic sequestration right are a party to the conservation easement or consent to the conservation easement.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 127, § 1; 2008, ch. 29, § 2.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, inserted “and geologic sequestration right” in (e).

Legislative intent. —

Laws 2008, ch. 29, §
3, provides:

“It is the intent of the legislature to clarify the ownership of pore space underlying the surface of the lands and waters of this state. All conveyances of interests in real property on and after July 1, 2008 shall be subject to the provisions of this act. All conveyances of real property made prior to July 1, 2008 shall be construed in accordance with the provisions of this act unless a person claiming an ownership interest contrary to the provisions of this act establishes such ownership by a preponderance of the evidence in an action to establish ownership of such interest.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 34-2-201(b)(iv).

§ 34-1-203.
Judicial action; modification; termination.

An action affecting a conservation easement may be brought by:

An owner of an interest in the real property burdened by the conservation easement;

A holder of the conservation easement;

A person having third-party rights of enforcement, as named in the instrument creating the conservation easement.

This article shall not affect the power of a court to modify or terminate a conservation easement in accordance with the principles of law and equity.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 127, § 1.

§ 34-1-204.
Validity.

A conservation easement is valid even though:

It is not appurtenant to an interest in real property;

It can be or has been assigned to another holder;

It is not of a character that has been recognized traditionally at common law;

It imposes a negative burden;

It imposes affirmative obligations upon the owner of an interest in the burdened property or upon the holder;

The benefit does not touch or concern the real property; or

There is no privity of estate or of contract.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 127, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this sectoin as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 34-1-205.
Applicability.

This article shall apply to any interest created after its effective date which complies with the requirements of this article, whether designated as a conservation easement or as a covenant, equitable servitude, restriction, easement or otherwise.

This article shall apply to any interest created before its effective date if it would have been enforceable had it been created after the effective date of this article unless retroactive application contravenes the constitution or laws of this state or the United States.

This article does not invalidate any interest whether designated as a conservation or preservation easement, a covenant, equitable servitude, restriction, easement or other designation that is enforceable under any other law of this state.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 127, § 1.

§ 34-1-206.
Uniformity of application and construction.

This article shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the laws with respect to the subject of the article among the states enacting it.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 127, § 1.

§ 34-1-207.
Eminent domain; taxation.

Conservation easements shall be subject to the state’s power of eminent domain in the same manner as any other real property interest.

The real property tax imposed upon real property subject to a conservation easement shall not be less than the amount of the ad valorem tax for the property had it been levied and assessed based upon the taxable value of agricultural land of similar productive use and value under W.S. 39-13-101(a)(iii) and 39-13-103(b)(x).

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 127, § 1.